Washington statutes.
RCW 43.08.064

Lost or destroyed warrants, instruments, or other evidence of indebtedness—Issuing officer to issue duplicate.

In case of the loss or destruction of a state warrant for the payment of money, or any bond or other instrument or evidence of indebtedness, issued by any state officer, or agency, such officer, or such agency through its appropriate officer may issue or cause to be issued a duplicate in lieu thereof, in all respects and for the same amount as the original. The duplicate instrument so issued shall be subject in all other respects to the same provisions of law as the original instrument.

[ 2018 c 35 s 4; 1979 ex.s. c 71 s 3; 1975-'76 2nd ex.s. c 77 s 2; 1965 ex.s. c 61 s 1; 1965 c 8 s 43.08.064. Prior: 1890 p 639 s 15; RRS s 11010; prior: 1888 p 236 s 1. Formerly RCW 43.09.110.]

NOTES:

Lost or destroyed evidence of indebtedness issued by local governments: Chapter 39.72 RCW.